Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 42
MINING DISTRICT LAWS

Section

34-42-101. Mining district records - filed.

A copy of all the records, laws, and proceedings of each mining district, insofar as they relate to lode claims, shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the district is situated, within the boundaries of the mining district attached to the same, which shall be taken as evidence in any court having jurisdiction in the matters contained in such record or proceeding. All such records of deeds and conveyances, laws, and proceedings of any mining district filed in the county clerk and recorder's office of the proper county prior to November 7, 1861, and transcripts thereof duly certified, whether such records relate to gulch claims, lode claims, building lots, or other real estate, shall have the like effect as evidence.

Source:

R.S.

p. 466, § 11.

G.L.

§ 1807.

G.S.

§ 2396.

R.S. 08:

§ 4258.

C.L.

§ 3382.

CSA:

C. 110, § 274.

CRS 53:

§ 92-21-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-21-1.

34-42-102. Proof of customs and regulations admitted.

In actions regarding mining claims, proof shall be admitted of the customs, usages, and regulations established and in force in the mining districts embracing such claims; and such customs, usages, and regulations, when not in conflict with the laws of this state or of the United States, shall govern the decision in the action.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 198, § 363.

Code 08:

§ 397.

Code 21:

§ 398.

Code 35:

§ 398.

CRS 53:

§ 92-21-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-21-2.

34-42-103. Jury may view mining premises.

In all suits, actions, and proceedings brought in any court of this state involving title to, the right of possession of, or the mineral contained in any mine or mining claims, it is the duty of the court, at the trial of such suit, and upon the application of either party interested therein, to send the jury impaneled in the case, in a body, to view and inspect the premises. Each party to the suit shall have the privilege of nominating one person, to be approved by the court, to attend with the jury in their view and investigation of the premises in controversy, and such persons so selected and appointed by the court shall be authorized to act as guides to the jury, and to point out such features in the premises as it is desirable that the jury should see and answer all questions propounded by the jury; but such persons so selected shall not be at liberty to argue or discuss any questions involved in the case either with the jury or with each other in the presence of the jury; and if such persons violate the above provision, the court has the power to punish anyone so offending for contempt of court by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars or by imprisonment for not more than ten days in the county jail.

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 78, § 1.

Code 08:

§ 206.

Code 21:

§ 207.

Code 35:

§ 207.

CRS 53:

§ 92-21-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-21-3.

Cross references:

For civil contempt, see C.R.C.P. 107.

34-42-104. Expenses.

The expenses incurred in sending the jury to investigate mining premises, as provided in section 34-42-103, shall be paid by the parties to the suit in equal proportions, unless the demand for such investigation is made by one party and objected to by the other, in which case the court may apportion such expenses as may seem just and equitable in the particular case.

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 78, § 2.

Code 08:

§ 207.

Code 21:

§ 208.

Code 35:

§ 208.

CRS 53:

§ 92-21-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-21-4.